Utah statutes.
48-2c-122 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Statement of person named as manager or member.

Any person named as a manager or member of a domestic company or foreign company in an annual report or other document on file with the division may, if that person does not hold the position of manager or member, deliver to the division for filing a written statement setting forth:

(1)  the person's name;

(2)  the name of the company;

(3)  information sufficient to identify the report or other document in which that person is named as a manager or member; and

(4)  the date on which he ceased to be a manager or member of the company, or a statement that the person did not hold the position for which that person was named in the report or other document.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

